hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Áram > UPS-kiegészítők: UPS-akkumulátorszekrények; UPS bypass-kapcsolók; UPS-kommunikációs kábelek; UPS-hálózatkezelő kártyák; UPS-állványrögzítő készletek
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Strøm > UPS – tilbehør: UPS-batterikabinetter; UPS-bypasskontakter; UPS-kommunikationskabler; UPS-netværksstyringskort; UPS-rackmonteringssæt
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電源 > 不斷電系統配件: UPS 電池櫃; UPS 旁路開關; UPS 通訊線材; UPS 網路管理卡; UPS 機架安裝工具包
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 전력 > UPS 부대용품: UPS 배터리 캐비닛; UPS 바이패스 스위치; UPS 통신 케이블; UPS 네트워크 관리 카드; UPS 랙 설치 키트
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Электропитание > Аксессуары для ИБП: Батарейные шкафы для ИБП; Байпасные переключатели ИБП; Коммуникационные кабели ИБП; Карты сетевого управления ИБП; Комплекты для монтажа ИБП в стойку
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Điện > Phụ kiện bộ lưu điện: Tủ pin UPS; Công tắc bỏ qua UPS; Cáp liên lạc UPS; Thẻ quản lý mạng UPS; Bộ dụng cụ lắp đặt giá đỡ UPS
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Strøm > UPS-tilbehør: UPS batteriskap; UPS omløpsbrytere; UPS kommunikasjonskabler; UPS nettverksadministrasjonskort; UPS-stativmonteringssett
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > 電力 > UPS関連用品: UPSバッテリーキャビネット; UPSバイパススイッチ; UPS通信ケーブル; UPSネットワーク管理カード; UPSラックマウントキット
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Virta > UPS-tarvikkeet: UPS-akkukaapit; UPS-ohituskytkimet; UPS-tietoliikennekaapelit; UPS-verkonhallintakortit; UPS-telineen kiinnityssarjat
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 供电设备 > UPS 配件: UPS 电池柜; UPS 旁路开关; UPS 通信线缆; UPS 网络管理卡; UPS 机架安装套件
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Power > UPS Accessories: UPS Battery Cabinets; UPS Bypass Switches; UPS Communication Cables; UPS Network Management Cards; UPS Rack Mounting Kits
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Napajanje > Dodaci za UPS: UPS ormarići za baterije; UPS premosni prekidači; UPS komunikacijski kabeli; UPS mrežne upravljačke kartice; Setovi za montažu UPS-a na stalak
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Ström > UPS-tillbehör: UPS-batteriskåp; UPS-bypassbrytare; UPS-kommunikationskablar; UPS-nätverkshanteringskort; UPS-rackmonteringsenheter
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Potencia > Accesorios UPS: Gabinetes de batería de UPS; Interruptores de bypass de UPS; Cables de comunicación de UPS; Tarjetas de gestión de red de UPS; Kits de montaje en bastidor de UPS
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Захранване > UPS аксесоари: Батерийни шкафове за UPS; Байпас превключватели за UPS; Комуникационни кабели за UPS; Мрежови карти за управление на UPS; Комплекти за монтаж на UPS на стелаж
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Power > UPS-accessoires: UPS batterij kasten; UPS bypass schakelaars; UPS communicatiekabels; UPS netwerkbeheer kaarten; UPS-rekmontagekits
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Napájení > Záložní zdroje – příslušenství: Bateriové skříně pro UPS; Bypassové přepínače pro UPS; Komunikační kabely pro UPS; Síťové správní karty pro UPS; Instalační sady pro montáž záložního zdroje (UPS) do racku
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Alimentare > Accesorii pentru UPS: Dulapuri pentru baterii UPS; Comutatoare de bypass UPS; Cabluri de comunicație UPS; Plăci de gestionare a rețelei UPS; Seturi de montare rack UPS
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Moc > Akcesoria do zasilaczy UPS: Szafki baterii UPS; Przełączniki obejścia UPS; Kable komunikacyjne UPS; Karty zarządzania siecią UPS; Zestawy do montażu zasilaczy UPS Rack
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Τροφοδοσία ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ UPS: Ερμάρια μπαταριών UPS; Διακόπτες παράκαμψης UPS; Καλώδια επικοινωνίας UPS; Κάρτες διαχείρισης δικτύου UPS; Κιτ τοποθέτησης UPS σε Rack
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่งกำลัง > อุปกรณ์ UPS: ตู้แบตเตอรี่เครื่องสำรองไฟ; สวิตช์บายพาสเครื่องสำรองไฟ; สายสื่อสารเครื่องสำรองไฟ; การ์ดจัดการเครือข่ายเครื่องสำรองไฟ; ชุดติดตั้งชั้นวาง UPS
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Potente > Acessórios para UPS: Gabinetes de bateria para UPS; Chaves de bypass para UPS; Cabos de comunicação para UPS; Placas de gerenciamento de rede para UPS; Kits de montagem de rack UPS
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Puissance > Accessoires pour systèmes d’alimentation sans interruption: Armoires de batteries UPS; Commutateurs de dérivation UPS; Câbles de communication UPS; Cartes de gestion réseau UPS; Kits de montage pour systèmes d’alimentation sans interruption en rack
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Leistung > Zubehör für USV: USV-Batterieschränke; USV-Bypass-Schalter; USV-Kommunikationskabel; USV-Netzwerkverwaltungskarten; USV-Rack-Montagekits
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Napajanje > Dodatki za neprekinjeno napajanje: Omare za UPS baterije; Bypass stikala za UPS; Komunikacijski kabli za UPS; Omrežne upravljalske kartice za UPS; Kompleti za montažo neprekinjenega napajanja
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Güç > UPS Aksesuarları: UPS Pil Kabinleri; UPS Baypas Anahtarları; UPS İletişim Kabloları; UPS Ağ Yönetim Kartları; UPS Raf Montaj Kitleri
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Maitinimas > Nepertraukiamo maitinimo šaltinių priedai: UPS baterijų spintos; UPS apėjimo jungikliai; UPS ryšio kabeliai; UPS tinklo valdymo plokštės; Nepertraukiamo maitinimo šaltinių montavimo ant stovų rinkiniai
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Gombík napájania > Príslušenstvo k záložným zdrojom elektrickej energie: Batériové skrinky UPS; Bypassové spínače UPS; Komunikačné káble UPS; Sieťové správcovské karty UPS; Súpravy na montáž záložných zdrojov elektrickej energie do stojana
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Energia > Acessórios de UPS: Armários para baterias de UPS; Comutadores de bypass para UPS; Cabos de comunicação para UPS; Placas de gestão de rede para UPS; Kits de montagem em UPS para rack
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Alimentazione > Accessori UPS: Armadi batterie UPS; Interruttori di bypass UPS; Cavi di comunicazione UPS; Schede di gestione della rete UPS; Kit di montaggio su rack UPS